Utah statutes.
63F-1-302.   Information Technology Rate Committee -- Membership -- Duties.
(1) (a)  There is created an Information Technology Rate Committee which shall
consist of:
(i)  the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, or a
designee;
(ii)  the executive directors, or their designee, of three executive branch
agencies that use services and pay rates to one of the department internal
service funds, appointed by the governor for a two-year term;
(iii)  the director of the Division of Finance, or a designee; and
(iv)  the chief information officer.
(b) (i)  The director of the Division of Finance shall serve as chair of the
committee.
(ii)  Members of the committee who are state government employees and who do
not receive salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service
on the committee shall receive no compensation, benefits, per diem, or
expenses for the member's service on the committee.
(c)  The department shall provide staff services to the committee.
(2) (a)  Any internal service funds managed by the department shall submit to
the committee a proposed rate and fee schedule for services rendered by the
department to an executive branch agency or an entity that subscribes to
services rendered by the department.
(b)  The committee shall:
(i)  conduct meetings in accordance with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public
Meetings Act;
(ii)  review the proposed rate and fee schedule and determine if the proposed
fee is based on cost recovery as required by Subsection 63F-1-301(2)(b);
(iii)  review the proposed rate and fee schedules and may approve, increase,
or decrease the rate and fee;
(iv)  recommend a proposed rate and fee schedule for each internal service
fund to:
(A)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget; and
(B)  the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst for review by the Legislature in
accordance with Section 63J-1-410, which requires the Legislature to approve
the internal service fund agency's rates, fees, and budget in an
appropriations act; and
(v)  in accordance with Section 63J-1-410, review and approve, increase or
decrease an interim rate, fee, or amount when an internal service fund agency
begins a new service or introduces a new product between annual general
sessions of the Legislature, which rate, fee, or amount shall be submitted to
the Legislature at the next annual general session.
(c)  The committee may, in accordance with Subsection 63J-1-410(4), decrease a
rate, fee, or amount that has been approved by the Legislature.
